Florida, session 2026, SB342.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (3) of section 22 1008.22, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 23 1008.22âStudent assessment program for public schools.â 24 (3)âSTATEWIDE, STANDARDIZED ASSESSMENT PROGRAM.âThe 25 Commissioner of Education shall design and implement a 26 statewide, standardized assessment program aligned to the core 27 curricular content established in the state academic standards. 28 The commissioner also must develop or select and implement a 29 common battery of assessment tools that will be used in all 30 juvenile justice education programs in the state. These tools 31 must accurately measure the core curricular content established 32 in the state academic standards. Participation in the assessment 33 program is mandatory for all school districts and all students 34 attending public schools, including adult students seeking a 35 standard high school diploma under s. 1003.4282 and students in 36 Department of Juvenile Justice education programs, except as 37 otherwise provided by law. If a student does not participate in 38 the assessment program, the school district must notify the 39 studentâs parent and provide the parent with information 40 regarding the implications of such nonparticipation. The 41 statewide, standardized assessment program shall be designed and 42 implemented as follows: 43 (d)âStudents with disabilities; Florida Alternate 44 Assessment; English language learners.â 45 1.âEach district school board must provide instruction to 46 prepare students with disabilities in the core content knowledge 47 and skills necessary for successful grade-to-grade progression 48 and high school graduation. 49 2.âA student with a disability, as defined in s. 1007.02, 50 for whom the individual education plan (IEP) team determines 51 that the statewide, standardized assessments under this section 52 cannot accurately measure the studentâs abilities, taking into 53 consideration all allowable accommodations, shall have 54 assessment results waived for the purpose of receiving a course 55 grade and a standard high school diploma. Such waiver must shall 56 be designated on the studentâs transcript. The statement of 57 waiver is shall be limited to a statement that performance on an 58 assessment was waived for the purpose of receiving a course 59 grade or a standard high school diploma, as applicable. 60 3.âThe State Board of Education shall adopt rules, based 61 upon recommendations of the commissioner, for the provision of 62 assessment accommodations for students with disabilities and for 63 students who have limited English proficiency. 64 a.âAccommodations that negate the validity of a statewide, 65 standardized assessment are not allowed during the 66 administration of the assessment. However, instructional 67 accommodations are allowed in the classroom if identified in a 68 studentâs IEP. Students using instructional accommodations in 69 the classroom which that are not allowed on a statewide, 70 standardized assessment may have assessment results waived if 71 the IEP team determines that the assessment cannot accurately 72 measure the studentâs abilities. 73 b.âIf a student is provided with instructional 74 accommodations in the classroom which that are not allowed as 75 accommodations for statewide, standardized assessments, the 76 district must inform the parent in writing and provide the 77 parent with information regarding the impact on the studentâs 78 ability to meet expected performance levels. A parent must 79 provide signed consent for a student to receive classroom 80 instructional accommodations that would not be available or 81 permitted on a statewide, standardized assessment and 82 acknowledge in writing that he or she understands the 83 implications of such instructional accommodations. 84 c.âIf a studentâs IEP states that online administration of 85 a statewide, standardized assessment will significantly impair 86 the studentâs ability to perform, the assessment must shall be 87 administered in hard copy. 88 d.(I)âBy the 2027-2028 school year, the Department of 89 Education shall develop a version of each statewide, 90 standardized assessment in the three most prevalent languages 91 represented in the English language learner population in this 92 state. The department shall establish criteria for when the use 93 of such assessments in a language other than English is 94 appropriate. A parent of a student who is an English language 95 learner may prohibit his or her student from being administered 96 an assessment in a language other than English. 97 (II)âThe department shall develop a timetable and an action 98 plan to develop and implement the assessments in the additional 99 languages as required under sub-sub-subparagraph (I) in addition 100 to such assessments in additional languages, as feasible. 101 4.âFor students with significant cognitive disabilities, 102 the Department of Education shall provide for implementation of 103 the Florida Alternate Assessment to accurately measure the core 104 curricular content established in the state academic standards. 105 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (9) of section 106 1008.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 107 1008.25âPublic school student progression; student support; 108 coordinated screening and progress monitoring; reporting 109 requirements.â 110 (9)âCOORDINATED SCREENING AND PROGRESS MONITORING SYSTEM.â 111 (a)âThe Department of Education, in collaboration with the 112 Office of Early Learning, shall procure and require the use of a 113 statewide, standardized coordinated screening and progress 114 monitoring system for the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 115 Program and public schools. The system must: 116 1.âMeasure student progress in meeting the appropriate 117 expectations in early literacy and mathematics skills and in 118 English Language Arts and mathematics standards as required by 119 ss. 1002.67(1)(a) and 1003.41 and identify the educational 120 strengths and needs of students. 121 2.âFor students in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 122 Program through grade 3, measure student performance in oral 123 language development, phonological and phonemic awareness, 124 knowledge of print and letters, decoding, fluency, vocabulary, 125 and comprehension, as applicable by grade level, and, at a 126 minimum, provide interval level and norm-referenced data that 127 measures equivalent levels of growth. 128 3.âBe a valid, reliable, and developmentally appropriate 129 computer-based direct instrument that provides screening and 130 diagnostic capabilities for monitoring student progress; 131 identifies students who have a substantial deficiency in reading 132 or mathematics, including identifying students with 133 characteristics of dyslexia, dyscalculia, and other learning 134 disorders; and informs instruction. Any student identified by 135 the system as having characteristics of dyslexia or dyscalculia 136 shall undergo further screening. Beginning with the 2023-2024 137 school year, the coordinated screening and progress monitoring 138 system must be computer-adaptive. 139 4.âProvide data for Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 140 Program accountability as required under s. 1002.68. 141 5.âProvide Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program 142 providers, school districts, schools, teachers, and parents with 143 data and resources that enhance differentiated instruction and 144 parent communication. 145 6.âProvide baseline data to the department of each 146 studentâs readiness for kindergarten. The determination of 147 kindergarten readiness must be based on the results of each 148 studentâs initial progress monitoring assessment in 149 kindergarten. The methodology for determining a studentâs 150 readiness for kindergarten must be developed by the department 151 and aligned to the methodology adopted pursuant to s. 152 1002.68(4). 153 7.âAssess how well educational goals and curricular 154 standards are met at the provider, school, district, and state 155 levels and provide information to the department to aid in the 156 development of educational programs, policies, and supports for 157 providers, districts, and schools. 158 8.âBy the 2027-2028 school year, be available for all 159 written portions and be in the three most prevalent languages 160 represented in the English language learner population in this 161 state. The department shall develop a timetable and an action 162 plan to develop and implement the written portions of the system 163 in such languages as required by sub-subparagraph a. in addition 164 to such portions in additional languages, as feasible. The 165 department shall establish criteria for when the use of such 166 portions of the system in a language other than English is 167 appropriate. A parent of a student who is an English language 168 learner may prohibit his or her student from being administered 169 such portions of the system in a language other than English. 170 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.